Maryland, session 2025, HB0470.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlii) Section 12–6C–09.1 of the Health Occupations Article; [or]
(xliii) Title 14, Subtitle 48 of this article; or
(XLIV) SECTION 13–411.1(C)(2) OF THE TRANSPORTATION
ARTICLE; OR
Article – Transportation
13–411.
(c) (1) At all times, each registration plate shall be:
(i) Maintained free from foreign materials, including registration
plate covers as defined in § 13–411.1 of this subtitle, and in a condition to be clearly legible;
and
(ii) Securely fastened to the vehicle for which it is issued:
1. In a horizontal position;
2. In a manner that prevents the plate from swinging; and
3. In a place and position to be clearly visible.
(2) For a violation involving the placement of an object framing or
bordering the edges of a registration plate, a police officer may enforce this subsection only
as a secondary action when the police officer detains a driver of a motor vehicle for a
suspected violation of another provision of the Code.
13–411.1.
(a) In this section, “registration plate cover” means any tinted, colored, painted,
marked, [clear,] or illuminated object that is designed to:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 566
(1) [Cover] OBSCURE OR BLOCK any of the characters of a vehicle’s
registration plate; or
(2) Distort a recorded image of any of the characters of a vehicle’s
registration plate recorded by a traffic control signal monitoring system under § 21–202.1
of this article.
(b) A person may not sell or offer for sale a registration plate cover.
(c) (1) A person may not advertise for the purpose of promoting the sale of
registration plate covers.
(2) A PERSON MAY NOT ADVERTISE FOR OR PROMOTE THE SALE OF
AN UNLAWFUL REGISTRATION PLATE COVER BY FALSELY CLAIMING THAT THE
REGISTRATION PLATE COVER IS LAWFUL IN THE STATE.
(D) A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (C)(2) OF THIS SECTION IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE; AND
(2) IN ADDITION TO THE PENALTY UNDER § 27–101 OF THIS ARTICLE,
SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS CONTAINED IN TITLE
13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE.
21–1112.1.
(a) A person may not obscure or modify any vehicle registration plate [with intent
to avoid] IN A MANNER THAT MAY PREVENT identification.
(b) A violation of this section is a moving violation for the purpose of the
assessment of points under § 16–402 of this article.
(C) A POLICE OFFICER MAY ENFORCE THIS SECTION ONLY AS A SECONDARY
ACTION WHEN THE POLICE OFFICER DETAINS A DRIVER OF A MOTOR VEHICLE FOR
A SUSPECTED VIOLATION OF ANOTHER PROVISION OF THE CODE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 3 –